Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2597.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of health services; tribal assisted living facilities and tribal nursing homes The sum of $15,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of health services to distribute to tribal governments to open or reopen tribal assisted living facilities and tribal nursing homes located in this state.  The department shall allocate the monies proportionally to tribal assisted living facilities and tribal nursing homes located in the northern, central and southern portions of this state, except that at least $1,500,000 must be allocated to the Hopi Tribe and at least $1,500,000 must be allocated to the Navajo Nation.